Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Chapter 65. Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 4, ch. 66, SLA 2010, this chapter “applies to an institutional fund held by an institution on or after September 8, 2010, and to decisions made or action taken by the institution relating to the institutional fund on or after September 8, 2010.”

Sec. 13.65.010.
Standard of conduct in managing and investing institutional funds.

Subject to the intent of a donor expressed in a gift instrument, an institution, in managing and investing an institutional fund, shall consider the charitable purposes of the institution and the purposes of the institutional fund.

In addition to complying with the duty of loyalty imposed by law other than this chapter, each person responsible for managing and investing an institutional fund shall manage and invest the fund in good faith and with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances.

In managing and investing an institutional fund, an institution

may incur only costs that are appropriate and reasonable in relation to the assets, the purposes of the institution, and the skills available to the institution; and

shall make a reasonable effort to verify facts relevant to the management and investment of the fund.

An institution may pool two or more institutional funds for purposes of management and investment.

Except as otherwise provided by a gift instrument, the following rules apply:

in managing and investing an institutional fund, the following factors, if relevant, must be considered:

general economic conditions;

the possible effect of inflation or deflation;

the expected tax consequences, if any, of investment decisions or strategies;

the role that each investment or course of action plays within the overall investment portfolio of the fund;

the expected total return from income and the appreciation of investments;

other resources of the institution;

the needs of the institution and the fund to make distributions and to preserve capital; and

an asset’s special relationship or special value, if any, to the charitable purposes of the institution;

management and investment decisions about an individual asset may not be made in isolation but rather in the context of the institutional fund’s portfolio of investments as a whole and as a part of an overall investment strategy having risk and return objectives reasonably suited to the fund and to the institution;

except as otherwise provided by law other than this chapter, an institution may invest in any kind of property or type of investment consistent with the standards of this section;

an institution shall diversify the investments of an institutional fund unless the institution reasonably determines that, because of special circumstances, the purposes of the fund are better served without diversification;

within a reasonable time after receiving property, an institution shall make and implement decisions concerning the retention or disposition of the property or to rebalance a portfolio in order to bring the institutional fund into compliance with the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the institution and the requirements of this chapter;

a person who has special skills or expertise, or is selected in reliance on the person’s representation that the person has special skills or expertise, has a duty to use those special skills or that expertise in managing and investing institutional funds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

13.70.010

; renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 13.65.020.
Appropriation for expenditure or accumulation of endowment fund; rules of construction.

Subject to the intent of a donor expressed in a gift instrument, an institution may appropriate for expenditure or accumulate so much of an endowment fund as the institution determines is prudent for the uses, benefits, purposes, and duration for which the endowment fund is established. Unless stated otherwise in a gift instrument, the assets in an endowment fund are donor-restricted assets until appropriated for expenditure by the institution. In making a determination to appropriate or accumulate, the institution shall act in good faith, with the care that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, and shall consider, if relevant, the following factors:

the duration and preservation of the endowment fund;

the purposes of the institution and the endowment fund;

general economic conditions;

the possible effect of inflation or deflation;

the expected total return from income and the appreciation of investments;

other resources of the institution; and

the investment policy of the institution.

To limit the authority to appropriate for expenditure or accumulate under (a) of this section, a gift instrument must specifically state the limitation.

Terms in a gift instrument designating a gift as an endowment, a direction or authorization in the gift instrument to use only “income,” “interest,” “dividends,” or “rents, issues, or profits,” or “to preserve the principal intact,” or words of similar meaning

create an endowment fund of permanent duration unless other language in the gift instrument limits the duration or purpose of the fund; and

do not otherwise limit the authority to appropriate for expenditure or accumulate under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

13.70.020

; renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 13.65.030.
Delegation of management and investment functions.

Subject to a specific limitation set out in a gift instrument or in law other than this chapter, an institution may delegate to an external agent the management and investment of an institutional fund to the extent that an institution could prudently delegate under the circumstances. An institution shall act in good faith, with the care that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, in

selecting an agent;

establishing the scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes of the institution and the institutional fund; and

periodically reviewing the agent’s actions in order to monitor the agent’s performance and compliance with the scope and terms of the delegation.

In performing a delegated function, an agent owes a duty to the institution to exercise reasonable care to comply with the scope and terms of the delegation.

An institution that complies with (a) of this section is not liable for the decisions or actions of an agent to whom the function was delegated.

By accepting delegation of a management or investment function from an institution that is subject to the laws of this state, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in all proceedings arising from or related to the delegation or the performance of the delegated function.

An institution may delegate management and investment functions to its committees, officers, or employees as authorized by law other than this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

13.70.030

; renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 13.65.040.
Release or modification of restrictions on management, investment, or purpose.

With the donor’s consent in a record, an institution may release or modify, in whole or in part, a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the management, investment, or purpose of an institutional fund. A release or modification may not allow a fund to be used for a purpose other than a charitable purpose of the institution.

If a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the management or investment of an institutional fund becomes impracticable or wasteful or impairs the management or investment of the fund, or if, because of circumstances not anticipated by the donor, a modification of a restriction will further the purposes of the fund, the court, on application of the institution, may modify the restriction. The institution shall notify the attorney general of the application. To the extent practicable, a modification shall be made in accordance with the donor’s probable intention.

If a particular charitable purpose or a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the use of an institutional fund becomes unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful, the court, on application of an institution, may modify the purpose of the fund or the restriction on the use of the fund in a manner consistent with the charitable purposes expressed in the gift instrument.

If an institution determines that a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the management, investment, or purpose of an institutional fund is unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful, the institution, 90 days or more after notification of the attorney general, may release or modify the restriction, in whole or part, if

the institutional fund subject to the restriction has a total value of less than $50,000;

more than 20 years have elapsed since the fund was established; and

the institution uses the property in a manner the institution reasonably determines to be consistent with the charitable purposes expressed in the gift instrument.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

13.70.040

; renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 13.65.050.
Reviewing compliance.

Compliance with this chapter is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time a decision is made or an action is taken.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

13.70.050

; renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 13.65.060.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes 15 U.S.C. 7001 — 7031 (Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act), but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. 7001(c) or authorize electronic delivery of a notice described in 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

13.70.060

; renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 13.65.070.
Application.

If another provision of law or of a governing instrument of an institution applies to an institutional fund but conflicts with this chapter, the other provision governs.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

13.70.070

; renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 13.65.080.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

13.70.080

; renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 13.65.090.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“charitable purpose” means the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, the promotion of a governmental purpose, or another purpose the achievement of which is beneficial to the community;

“endowment fund” means an institutional fund, or part of an institutional fund, not wholly expendable by the institution on a current basis under the terms of a gift instrument; the term does not include assets of an institution designated by an institution as an endowment fund for its own use;

“gift instrument” means a record, including an institutional solicitation, under which property is granted to, transferred to, or held by an institutional fund;

“institution” means

a person, other than an individual, organized and operated exclusively for charitable purposes;

a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, to the extent that it holds funds exclusively for a charitable purpose; or

a trust that had both charitable and noncharitable interests, after all noncharitable interests have terminated;

“institutional fund” means a fund held by an institution exclusively for charitable purposes; the term does not include

program-related assets;

a fund held for an institution by a trustee who is not an institution; or

a fund in which a beneficiary who is not an institution has an interest, other than an interest that could arise on a violation or failure of the purposes of the fund;

“person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or another legal or commercial entity;

“program-related asset” means an asset held by an institution primarily to accomplish a charitable purpose of the institution and not primarily for appreciation or the production of income;

“record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

13.70.090

; renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 13.65.095.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 66 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.70.095; renumbered in 2010.